Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2611
Sales of swine; recovery of damages.

A seller may bring an action against any packer violating section 54-2607 to recover damages sustained by reason of such violation.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 11.